Hawaii statutes.
[§113-2] Property acquired; reimbursement
of owner. In acquiring real property for use in any project or program in
which federal or federal-aid funds are used, the State shall as soon as
practicable after the date of payment of the purchase price or the date of
deposit into court of funds to satisfy a judgment in a condemnation proceeding
to acquire real property, whichever is the earlier, reimburse the owner, to the
extent the State deems fair and reasonable, for expenses the owner necessarily
incurred for (1) recording fees, transfer taxes and similar expenses incidental
to conveying such real property to the State; (2) penalty costs for prepayment
of any preexisting recorded mortgage loan entered into in good faith and
encumbering such real property; and (3) the pro rata portion of real property
taxes paid which are allocable to a period subsequent to the date of vesting
title in the State, or the effective date of possession of such real property
by the State, whichever is the earlier. [L 1971, c 32, §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next